Utah statutes.
76-6-302.   Aggravated robbery.

(1)  A person commits aggravated robbery if in the course of committing robbery, he:

(a)  uses or threatens to use a dangerous weapon as defined in Section 76-1-601;

(b)  causes serious bodily injury upon another; or

(c)  takes or attempts to take an operable motor vehicle.

(2)  Aggravated robbery is a first degree felony.

(3)  For the purposes of this part, an act shall be  considered to be "in the course of committing a robbery" if it occurs in an attempt to commit, during the commission of, or in the immediate flight after the attempt or commission of a robbery.

